Illinois, session 104th, HB2782.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prohibition on Automated Online Ticket Purchasing Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Bot" means any automated software program that performs 8automatic and repetitive tasks and is designed to impersonate 9or replicate human activity online. "Bot" does not include 10auto fill or password management features built into an 11Internet browser or provided through separate software.12    "Event" means a concert, theatrical performance, sporting 13event, exhibition, show, or similar scheduled activity that:14        (1) is open to the public;15        (2) is held in a public or private venue; and16        (3) requires payment of an admission fee to attend the 17    activity.18    "Ticket" means a physical or electronic certificate, 19voucher, document, token, or other evidence of a right for 20admission to enter a place of entertainment for one or more 21events at one or more specified dates and times. 22    Section 10. Prohibition on automated online ticket   HB2782- 2 -LRB104 09645 SPS 19711 b1purchasing. 2    (a) A person may not use or create a bot to:3        (1) purchase tickets in excess of posted limits for an 4    online ticket sale;5        (2) use multiple Internet protocol addresses, multiple 6    purchaser accounts, or multiple e-mail addresses to 7    purchase tickets in excess of posted limits for an online 8    ticket sale; or9        (3) circumvent or disable an electronic queue, waiting 10    period, presale code, or other sales volume limitation 11    system associated with an online ticket sale.12    (b) An owner or operator of a place of entertainment that 13sells tickets to events, and any agent who conducts or 14facilitates those sales, shall report to the Attorney General 15any incidents that violate subsection (a), of which the owner, 16operator, or agent has actual knowledge, within a reasonable 17period of time after the incident is discovered by the owner, 18operator, or agent, and in no case later than 30 days after the 19incident is discovered. 20    Section 15. Enforcement by Attorney General.21    (a) The Attorney General may investigate a claim that a 22person violated this Act.23    (b) If the Attorney General concludes that a person is 24violating this Act, the Attorney General may bring an action 25in the name of the People of the State to restrain or enjoin   HB2782- 3 -LRB104 09645 SPS 19711 b1the person from violating this Act.2    (c) In addition to bringing an action for injunctive 3relief under this Act, the Attorney General may seek 4restitution and petition a circuit court for the assessment of 5a civil penalty as provided by this Section.6    (d) A person who knowingly violates Section 10 is liable 7for a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each 8violation.9    (e) Every ticket transaction in which a ticket is acquired 10to be sold in violation of Section 10 constitutes a separate 11violation for purposes of assessing a civil penalty.12    (f) The civil penalty for a violation of a court order or 13injunction issued to enforce this Act may not exceed $100,000.14    (g) The Attorney General may recover all reasonable costs 15of bringing an action under this Section, including court 16costs, reasonable attorneys' fees, and investigation costs.